Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-341
Licensed manufacturer; duty to keep records.

Every licensed manufacturer shall keep and maintain a complete set of records which shall include all details of all activities of the licensee related to the conduct of the licensed activity as may be required by the department, including the total number of pickle card units sold to any Nebraska-licensed distributor. Such records shall be available for inspection by the department. The records shall be maintained for a period of not less than three years from the date of the end of the licensee's fiscal year.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-143.04;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 107.